Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1-109, as
amended by Section 1 of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 758 of the 1st
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, is amended to read as
follows:

Section 1-109. A. For all public schools in this state, school
shall actually be in session and classroom instruction offered:
1. For not less than one hundred eighty (180) one hundred
eighty-one (181) days;
2. For not less than one thousand eighty (1,080) one thousand
eighty-six (1,086) hours each school year, if a district board of
education adopts a school-hours policy and notifies the State Board
of Education prior to October 15 of the applicable school year;
3. Beginning with the 2021-2022 2025-2026 school year, for not
less than one thousand eighty (1,080) one thousand eighty-six
(1,086) hours with a minimum of one hundred sixty-five (165) one
hundred sixty-six (166) days of instruction each school year, if a
district board of education adopts a school-hours policy and
notifies the State Board of Education prior to October 15 of the
applicable school year; or
4. Beginning with the 2021-2022 2025-2026 school year, for not
less than one thousand eighty (1,080) one thousand eighty-six
(1,086) hours each school year, if a district board of education
adopts a school-hours policy, notifies the State Board of Education
prior to October 15 of the applicable school year, and meets the
requirements established by the State Board of Education pursuant to
subsection H of this section.
B. A school district may not count more than thirty (30) hours
each school year that are used for attendance of professional
meetings toward the one hundred eighty (180) one hundred eighty-one
(181) days or one thousand eighty (1,080) one thousand eighty-six
(1,086) hours of classroom instruction time required in subsection A
of this section.
C. Teachers off contract with an employing district shall not
be required by the employing school district to attend professional
meetings unless the teacher is paid additional compensation for the
additional time. Teachers may be paid additional compensation for
attending professional meetings in excess of their contract term.
Subject to district board of education policy or collective
bargaining agreement, additional paid professional days may be
granted for individual teachers to attend or participate in
professional meetings, staff development training, or National Board
certification portfolio development as provided for in Section 6-
204.2 of this title.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 2

D. A school district may authorize parent-teacher conferences
to be held during a regular school day. If authorized by the school
district, parent-teacher conferences shall be counted as classroom
instruction time for no more than six (6) hours per semester, for a
total of twelve (12) hours per school year.
E. A school district may maintain school for less than a full
school year only when conditions beyond the control of school
authorities make the maintenance of the term impossible and the
State Board of Education has been apprised and has expressed
concurrence in writing.
F. The State Board of Education shall establish criteria for an
extended-day schedule for schools subject to paragraph 1 of
subsection A of this section. The criteria shall:
1. Prescribe a lengthened school day within limits determined
not to be detrimental to quality instruction;
2. Ensure that the schedule is equivalent in annual hours of
instruction to the one-hundred-eighty-day one-hundred-eighty-one-day
school year specified in paragraph 1 of subsection A of this
section; and
3. Be consistent with the provisions of this section and
Sections 1-111 and 1-112 of this title but may result in fewer
annual days of instruction.
G. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection F of this
section, a school district board of education subject to paragraph 1
of subsection A of this section may adopt and implement an extended-
day schedule subject to the following requirements:
1. The annual number of hours of instruction shall equal or
exceed one thousand eighty (1,080) one thousand eighty-six (1,086)
hours, which is the equivalent of one hundred eighty (180) one
hundred eighty-one (181) days of instruction as specified in
subsection A of this section for six (6) hours each day as specified
in Section 1-111 of this title;
2. The annual number of days of instruction shall equal or
exceed one hundred eighty (180) one hundred eighty-one (181) days as
specified in subsection A of this section;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 3

3. The schedule adopted shall be consistent with the provisions
of Sections 1-111 and 1-112 of this title, except that for not more
than one (1) day per week, a school day shall consist of not less
than five (5) hours devoted to academic instruction in a regular
classroom setting;
4. The district shall hold a public hearing prior to the
adoption of an extended-day schedule authorized pursuant to this
subsection; and
5. The district shall document the impact on student
achievement as determined by the academic performance data score and
any other relevant factors that are a result of implementation of an
extended-day schedule authorized pursuant to this subsection and
provide an annual report to the State Board of Education of the
results. If improvement in student achievement cannot be documented
in the report, the district board of education shall revoke
authorization as provided by this subsection. If the district board
of education does not revoke authorization after student achievement
is not documented in the report, the State Board of Education may
deny accreditation of any school in violation of this subsection.
H. Beginning with the 2021-2022 school year, a school district
board of education may adopt a school-hours policy as provided for
by paragraph 4 of subsection A of this section only if it meets or
exceeds the minimum guidelines for student performance and school
district cost savings established by the State Board of Education.
The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules, subject to
approval by the Legislature, establishing the minimum guidelines for
student performance and school district cost savings.
I. If subject to paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section, a
district board of education or designee may elect to close a school
during the school day for inclement weather purposes. In such an
event, the number of hours incurred in classroom instruction time
prior to school closure shall be counted toward the one thousand
eighty (1,080) one thousand eighty-six (1,086) hours per year
requirement.
J. 1. Except as provided for in paragraph 2 of this
subsection, beginning with the 2026-2027 school year a school
district or charter school shall not count days or portions of days
when school is closed and virtual instruction is provided toward the
one hundred eighty (180) one hundred eighty-one (181) days or one
thousand eighty (1,080) one thousand eighty-six (1,086) hours of
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 4

classroom instruction time required by subsection A of this section.
For the purposes of this subsection, "virtual instruction" means the
use of the Internet or other digital information transmission
systems as a form of instruction.
2. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school district
or charter school may count up to two (2) days or twelve (12) hours
when school is closed and virtual instruction is provided toward the
one hundred eighty (180) one hundred eighty-one (181) days or one
thousand eighty (1,080) one thousand eighty-six (1,086) hours of
classroom instruction time required by subsection A of this section
only if:
a. the Superintendent of Public Instruction has approved
the virtual instruction plan submitted by a school
district board of education or charter school
governing board. A school district board of education
or charter school governing board shall approve its
virtual instruction plan, publish the plan on the
website for the school district or charter school, and
submit it to the Superintendent of Public Instruction
by November 1, 2025. The Superintendent shall approve
or disapprove all submitted virtual instruction plans
by January 31, 2026. A school district board of
education or charter school governing board shall
review its virtual instruction plan annually and
approve any necessary revisions for submission to the
Superintendent of Public Instruction by November 1
each subsequent year, and the Superintendent shall
approve or disapprove submitted plans by January 31
each subsequent year. If a plan is disapproved, the
school district board of education or charter school
governing board may approve a revised plan, publish it
on the website for the school district or charter
school, and submit it to the Superintendent. The plan
shall include a virtual needs assessment which shall
address availability of technology infrastructure to
deliver virtual instruction. The plan shall also
address how the school district or charter school
plans to provide:
(1) instruction to students on an Individualized
Education Program (IEP),
(2) child nutrition services, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 5

(3) transportation for students enrolled in
technology center school courses or programs,
b. a state of emergency or proclamation has been issued
by the Governor for a specific reason relating to
school district or charter school operations, and
c. the school district board of education or charter
school governing board approves the use of virtual
instruction.
3. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to
statewide virtual charter schools or full-time virtual education
programs operated by a school district.
K. By June 30, 2027, and by June 30 each subsequent year, the
State Department of Education shall publish on its website and
electronically submit to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a report
with information regarding the use of virtual instruction as
authorized by subsection J of this section. The report shall
include, at a minimum:
1. The school districts and charter schools that closed school
and provided virtual instruction as authorized by subsection J of
this section and the length of time virtual instruction was
provided; and
2. The reason for which school was closed and virtual
instruction was provided.
L. Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting the
right of an employing school district to require teachers as defined
in Section 6-101.3 of this title to work in excess of the one
thousand eighty (1,080) one thousand eighty-six (1,086) hours
required for student instruction. In addition, nothing in this
section shall be construed to affect the Fair Labor Standards Act of
1938 status of any school district employee.
M. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit the
Oklahoma School for the Blind or the Oklahoma School for the Deaf
from adopting an alternative school-hours policy if the Oklahoma
School for the Blind or the Oklahoma School for the Deaf notifies
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 6

and receives approval from the State Board of Education prior to
October 15 of the applicable school year.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 18-114.15,
as amended by Section 2 of Enrolled House Bill No. 1465 of the 1st
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, is amended to read as
follows:
Section 18-114.15. A. Beginning with the 2023-2024 2025-2026
school year, certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of
this title, in the public schools of Oklahoma this state shall
receive in salary and/or fringe benefits not less than the amounts
specified in the following schedule:
MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE
National
Years of Bachelor's Board Master's Doctor's
Experience Degree Certification Degree Degree
0 $39,601 $40,759 $40,991 $42,381
1 $40,035 $41,193 $41,425 $42,815
2 $40,469 $41,628 $41,859 $43,249
3 $40,904 $42,062 $42,294 $43,684
4 $41,338 $42,496 $42,728 $44,118
5 $42,810 $43,968 $44,200 $45,590
6 $43,273 $44,432 $44,663 $46,054
7 $43,737 $44,895 $45,127 $46,517
8 $44,200 $45,358 $45,590 $46,980
9 $44,663 $45,822 $46,054 $47,444
10 $46,684 $47,844 $48,568 $50,945
11 $47,177 $48,336 $49,061 $51,438
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 7

12 $47,670 $48,829 $49,554 $51,931
13 $48,162 $49,322 $50,047 $52,424
14 $48,655 $49,815 $50,539 $52,916
15 $50,167 $51,327 $52,052 $54,430
16 $50,660 $51,820 $52,545 $54,923
17 $51,153 $52,313 $53,038 $55,416
18 $51,646 $52,806 $53,531 $55,909
19 $52,139 $53,299 $54,024 $56,402
20 $52,652 $53,813 $54,538 $56,917
21 $53,145 $54,306 $55,031 $57,410
22 $53,639 $54,799 $55,524 $57,903
23 $54,132 $55,292 $56,018 $58,397
24 $54,625 $55,785 $56,511 $58,890
25 $56,049 $57,232 $57,971 $60,395
26 $56,542 $57,725 $58,464 $60,888
27 $57,035 $58,218 $58,957 $61,381
28 $57,528 $58,711 $59,450 $61,874
29 $58,021 $59,204 $59,943 $62,367
30 $58,541 $59,724 $60,463 $62,887
31 $59,001 $60,184 $60,923 $63,347
32 $59,494 $60,677 $61,416 $63,840
33 $59,987 $61,170 $61,909 $64,333
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 8

34 $60,480 $61,663 $62,402 $64,826
35 $60,973 $62,156 $62,895 $65,319
Master's Degree +
Years of National Board
Experience Certification
0 $42,149
1 $42,583
2 $43,018
3 $43,452
4 $43,886
5 $45,358
6 $45,822
7 $46,285
8 $46,749
9 $47,212
10 $49,728
11 $50,221
12 $50,713
13 $51,206
14 $51,699
15 $53,212
16 $53,705
17 $54,198
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 9

18 $54,691
19 $55,184
20 $55,698
21 $56,192
22 $56,685
23 $57,178
24 $57,671
25 $59,153
26 $59,646
27 $60,139
28 $60,632
29 $61,125
30 $61,645
31 $62,105
32 $62,598
33 $63,091
34 $63,584
35 $64,077
B. 1. When determining the Minimum Salary Schedule minimum
salary schedule, "fringe benefits" shall mean all or part of
retirement benefits, excluding the contributions made pursuant to
subsection A of Section 17-108.1 of this title and the flexible
benefit allowance pursuant to Section 26-105 of this title from the
flexible benefit allowance funds disbursed by the State Board of
Education and the State Board of Career and Technology Education
pursuant to Section 26-104 of this title.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 10

2. If a school district intends to provide retirement benefits
to a teacher such that the teacher's salary would be less than the
amounts set forth in the minimum salary schedule specified in
subsection A of this section, the district shall be required to
provide written notification to the teacher prior to his or her
employment or, if already employed by the district, no later than
thirty (30) days prior to the date the district elects to provide
retirement benefits such that the teacher's salary would be less
than the minimum salary schedule.
C. Any of the degrees referred to in this section shall be from
a college recognized by the State Board of Education. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from out-of-state school districts
that are accredited by the State Board of Education or appropriate
state accrediting agency for the districts. The Board shall accept
teaching experience from out-of-country schools that are accredited
or otherwise endorsed by the appropriate national or regional
accrediting or endorsement authority. Out-of-country certification
documentation in a language other than English shall be analyzed by
an educational credential evaluation service in accordance with
industry standards and guidelines and approved by the State
Department of Education. The person seeking to have credit granted
for out-of-country teaching experience shall be responsible for all
costs of the analysis by a credential evaluation service. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from primary and secondary schools
that are operated by the United States Department of Defense or are
affiliated with the United States Department of State.
D. For the purpose of state salary increments and retirement,
no teacher shall be granted credit for more than five (5) years of
active duty in the military service, as defined in Section 17-113 of
this title, or out-of-state or out-of-country teaching experience as
a certified teacher or its equivalent. Nothing in this section
shall prohibit boards of education from crediting more years of
experience on district salary schedules than those allowed for state
purposes.
E. The State Board of Education shall recognize, for purposes
of certification and salary increments, all the years of experience
of a:
1. Certified teacher who teaches in the educational program of
the Department of Corrections, beginning with fiscal year 1981;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 11

2. Vocational rehabilitation counselor under the Department of
Human Services if the counselor was employed as a certified teacher
by the State Department of Education when the Division of Vocational
Rehabilitation was transferred from the State Board of Career and
Technology Education or the State Board of Education to the Oklahoma
Public Welfare Commission on July 1, 1968;
3. Vocational rehabilitation counselor which were completed
while employed by the Department of Human Services if such counselor
was certified as a teacher or was eligible for certification as a
teacher in Oklahoma this state;
4. Certified teacher which were completed while employed by the
Child Study Center located at University Hospital, if the teacher
was certified as a teacher in Oklahoma this state; and
5. Certified school psychologist or psychometrist which were
completed while employed as a doctoral intern, psychological
assistant, or psychologist with any agency of the State of Oklahoma
this state if the experience primarily involved work with persons of
school- or preschool-age and if the person was, at the time the
experience was acquired, certified as, or eligible for certification
as, a school psychologist or psychometrist.
F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to teachers
who have entered into postretirement employment with a public school
in Oklahoma this state and are still receiving a monthly retirement
benefit.
G. If a person employed as certified personnel, as defined in
Section 26-103 of this title, by a school district during the 2022-
2023 school year was receiving a salary above the step level
indicated by the State Minimum Salary Schedule for the 2022-2023
school year, the person shall receive a salary increase amount equal
to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step
level indicated for the person, provided they remain employed by the
same district, unless the hours or the duties of the certified
personnel are reduced proportionately.
H. If a school district does not receive Foundation or Salary
Incentive Aid pursuant to Section 18-200.1 of this title, funds
shall be allocated by the State Board of Education to implement the
salary increases indicated in subsection A of this section.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 12

I. Persons employed as classroom instructional employees of
technology center school districts supervised by the State Board of
Career and Technology Education shall receive a salary increase
amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section
for the step level indicated for the person, provided they remain
employed by the same technology center school district, unless the
hours or the duties of the classroom instructional employees are
reduced proportionately.
J. H. Persons employed as correctional teachers or vocational
instructors by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Section
510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes or persons employed as
teachers by the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall receive a salary
increase amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of
this section for the step level indicated for the person, provided
they remain employed by the same Department of Corrections or Office
of Juvenile Affairs facility, unless the hours or the duties of the
correctional teachers, vocational instructors, or teachers are
reduced proportionately.
K. I. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of
Rehabilitation Services shall receive a salary increase amount equal
to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step
level indicated for the person, provided they remain employed by the
State Department of Rehabilitation Services, unless the hours or the
duties of the teachers are reduced proportionately.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 13

Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1087 Page 14